Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Certified Electronic Recyclers

§ 49-2-101.
Definitions.

As used in Sections 49-2-101 and 49-2-103:

“Electronics” means a personal computer, computer component, audio player, videocassette player, facsimile machine, copy machine, cellular telephone, wireless paging device, or any electronic item containing an intact or broken cathode-ray tube. An electronic item containing a cathode-ray tube includes a television, computer monitor, or any other cathode-ray tube monitor or display device.

“Recycler” means a person who uses, reuses or reclaims obsolete electronic equipment and associated materials.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 351, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 49-2-103.
Program to encourage certification of electronic recyclers; directory of certified electronic recyclers; compliance; applicability.

The Department of Environmental Quality shall develop a program to encourage all electronic recyclers to become certified by demonstrating to an accredited, independent third-party auditor that they meet specific standards to safely recycle and manage electronic equipment.

The department shall maintain a directory of recyclers meeting the accredited certification standards of Responsible Recycling Practices (R2) and the e-Stewards Standards and any recyclers who have been certified by an accredited, independent certification auditor listed by the ANSI-ASQ National Accreditation Board (ANAB) as an organization that certifies recyclers to available recycling standards.

State agencies shall use a certified recycler on the directory for the disposal of agency electronics.

The Department of Environmental Quality and state agencies shall comply with this section no later than July 1, 2014.

This section does not apply to the donation of electronics to public schools, state agencies, local governments or nonprofit organizations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 351, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2013.